Arkansas statutes. Title 25 State Government
Chapter 30 Career and Technical Education
25-30-107. Powers and duties of Division of Career and Technical Education.

All personnel of the Division of Career and Technical Education shall be employed by and serve at the pleasure of the Secretary of the Department of Education.

However, this section does not reduce any rights or benefits of employees, including retirement benefits, that they had when employed by the Department of Career Education.

The authority and responsibility of the State Board of Education and the division shall include general control and supervision of all programs of vocational, technical, and occupational education in secondary institutions.

This authority shall apply to programs in:

State area vocational high school centers;

State public schools; and

Any other public educational facility or institution now in existence or hereafter established in the state with the exception of technical colleges, community colleges, universities, and colleges.

A.C.R.C. Notes. See note at §25-30-103.

Amendments. The 2015 amendment substituted “Department of Career Education” for “department” in the section heading; and rewrote the section.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Career and Technical Education” for “Department of Career Education” in the section heading and in (a)(1); substituted “Secretary of the Department of Education” for “Director of the Department of Career Education” in (a)(1); in (b)(1), substituted “State Board of Education” for “Career Education and Workforce Development Board” and substituted “division” for “department”; and, in (b)(2), deleted former (A) and (B) and redesignated former (C)-(E) as present (A)-(C).

Publisher's Notes. This section, concerning the authority of the Director of the Department of Career Education to enter into contracts, was repealed by Acts 2019, No. 910, § 2392, effective July 1, 2019. The section was derived from Acts 1999, No. 1323, § 58; 2015, No. 892, § 5.

(1)There is created within the Department of Commerce the Office of Skills Development.

The director may hire personnel necessary to carry out the duties of the office.

The office shall have exclusive authority to award grants under this section.

An organization that is awarded a grant under this section may use the grant for the training of both new and incumbent employees of businesses in this state.

As a condition for receiving a grant under this subsection, the office may require a public or private organization to provide matching funds at a percentage to be determined by the office;

Design procedures and criteria for awarding grants under this section;

Receive and review applications for grants under this section;

Prescribe the form, nature, and extent of the information that shall be contained in an application for a grant under this section;

Audit and inspect the records of grant recipients;

Require reports from grant recipients; and

Use available labor market information systems to collect, analyze, and disseminate information on current and projected employment opportunities in this state and other appropriate information relating to labor market dynamics as determined by the office.

The office shall make the information contained in the labor market information system available on the office's website.

On or before October 1 of each year, the office shall submit a report to the Governor and the cochairs of the Legislative Council providing an account of the activities and expenditures of the office during the preceding calendar year.

The office shall consult with the Arkansas Economic Development Commission in reviewing applications for workforce training grants under this section.

A.C.R.C. Notes. See note at §25-30-103.

Acts 2015, No. 985, § 25, provided: “FUND TRANSFER — SKILLS DEVELOPMENT FUND.

Immediately upon the effective date of this Act, the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State shall transfer on his or her books and those of the State Treasurer and the Auditor of the State an amount up to fifteen million, five hundred thirty-four thousand, two hundred fifty-six dollars ($15,534,256) from the Arkansas Economic Development Commission Fund Account to the Skills Development Fund at the Department of Career Education for the Office of Skills Development.”

Amendments. The 2015 amendment rewrote the section.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Department of Commerce the” for “Department of Career Education under the oversight of the Career Education and Workforce Development Board an” in (a)(1); substituted “Secretary of the Department of Commerce” for “Director of the Department of Career Education” in (a)(2)(A); substituted “Office of Skills Development” for “Department of Career Education” in (a)(2)(B); deleted “the Department of Career Education and other” following “Use” in (b)(7)(A); and substituted “Office of Skills Development's website” for “Department of Career Education's website” in (b)(7)(B).

A.C.R.C. Notes. Acts 2015, No. 867, § 10, provided:

“COMPREHENSIVE SYSTEM OF PERSONNEL DEVELOPMENT. Section 101(a)(7) of the Rehabilitation Act Amendments of 1992, commonly referred to as the Comprehensive System of Personnel Development (CSPD), requires State Vocational Rehabilitation (VR) agencies to establish qualified personnel standards for rehabilitation personnel, including VR counselors, that are consistent with any national or State-approved or recognized certification, licensing, or registration that apply to a particular profession. In order to comply with the Rehabilitation Act and its State Plan requirements, there is hereby authorized for the Department of Career Education-Arkansas Rehabilitation Services a general waiver of the Financial Management Guide, R1-19-4-522 Continuing Professional Education. This waiver allows the agency to provide college level coursework in degree programs for any eligible employees selected by the agency. This provision covers any and all formula and discretionary grants funded by the U.S.D.O.E. Rehabilitation Services Administration, now or in the future, including, but not limited to, the Vocational Rehabilitation Program, Supported Employment, Independent Living, and the Staff Development Grant. The waiver applies to federal financial participation (FFP), state general revenue share, and program income.

“The provisions of this section shall be in effect from July 1, 2015 through June 30, 2016.”

Acts 2016, No. 89, § 4, provided: “COMPREHENSIVE SYSTEM OF PERSONNEL DEVELOPMENT.

The Rehabilitation Act Amendments of 1992, commonly referred to as the Comprehensive System of Personnel Development (CSPD), requires State Vocational Rehabilitation (VR) agencies to establish qualified personnel standards for rehabilitation personnel, including Vocational Rehabilitation Counselors, that are consistent with any national or State-approved or recognized certification, licensing, or registration that apply to a particular profession. In order to comply with the Rehabilitation Act and its State Plan requirements, there is hereby authorized for the Department of Human Services, Division of Services for the Blind a general waiver of the Financial Management Guide, R1-19-4-522 Continuing Professional Education. This waiver allows the agency to provide college level coursework in degree programs for Rehabilitation Counselors selected by the agency. This provision covers any and all formula and discretionary grants funded by the U.S. Department of Education Rehabilitation Services Administration, now or in the future, including, but not limited to, the Vocational Rehabilitation Program, Supported Employment, Independent Living, and the Staff Development Grant. No state general revenue shall be expended for the tuition in pursuit of a degree authorized herein.

“The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2016 through June 30, 2017.”

Effective Dates. Acts 2015, No. 892, § 8: Apr. 1, 2015. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that Arkansas workforce education operates within a variety of agencies without coordination, often with significant inefficiencies arising from overlapping and repeated programming; that this act will bring workforce education programs together under a single umbrella agency; and that this act is immediately necessary because the effectiveness of this act is essential to the operation of the programs for which appropriations will be provided, and that in the event of an extension of the legislative session, the delay in the effective date of this act could work irreparable harm upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental programs. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2015 (1st Ex. Sess.), Nos. 7 and 8, § 153: July 1, 2015. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the Arkansas Building Authority, the Arkansas Science and Technology Authority, the Department of Rural Services, and the Division of Land Surveys of the Arkansas Agriculture Department are inefficiently structured; that this inefficient structuring causes an excessive and unnecessary cost to the taxpayers of the this state; and that this act is essential to alleviating that financial burden. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2015.”

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

A.C.R.C. Notes. Acts 2015, No. 892, § 1, provided:

“Findings.

“(1)Occupational, technical, and industrial training provides unique opportunities to improve the lives of Arkansans while advancing the state's economic development;

“(2)Businesses seeking to begin operations in Arkansas look to the level of education and skills in the workforce as a key factor in makinginvestment decisions;

“(3)Currently, Arkansas workforce education proceeds in a variety of agencies, without coordination, often with significant inefficiencies arising from overlapping and repeated programming and from important programs being overlooked as presumably covered by another program; and

“(4)Bringing coordination of all state and federal career education and workforce development programs will:

“(A)Reduce duplication of programming;

“(B)Ensure that every Arkansan who seeks occupational, technical, and industrial training will find an appropriate education program in this state;

“(C)Bring consistency and efficiency to the state's career education and workforce development efforts; and

“(D)Alert industry to the commitment of the State of Arkansas to economic development through career education and workforce education.”

Amendments. The 2015 amendment substituted “Career Education and Workforce Development Board” for “State Board of Workforce Education and Career Opportunities” in (a); and substituted “Department of Career Education” for “Department of Workforce Education” in (b).

The 2019 amendment deleted “of the Department of Career Education” following “Arkansas Rehabilitation Services” in (b).

To be the sole state agency to supervise and administer the rehabilitation services authorized by this subchapter except such part or parts as may be administered by a local agency in a political subdivision of the state, in which case the Arkansas Rehabilitation Services shall be the sole agency to supervise such a local agency in the administration of such part or parts;

To conduct research and compile statistics relative to the provision of services or the need of services of disabled individuals; and

To administer the Arkansas Rehabilitation Services Forgiveness of Student Loan Program.

A.C.R.C. Notes. Acts 2007, No. 1207, § 3, provided: “This Arkansas Rehabilitation Services Forgiveness of Student Loan Program expires on June 30, 2009.”

Amendments. The 2019 amendment, in (a), substituted “Division of Workforce Services” for “State Board of Career Education” and “Arkansas Rehabilitation Services” for “the Arkansas Rehabilitation Services of the Department ofCareer Education”.

History.

Acts 1999, No. 1323, § 58; 2015, No. 892, § 5; 2019, No. 910, § 2391.

25-30-108. [Repealed.]

(A)The Director of the Office of Skills Development shall be appointed by the Secretary of the Department of Commerce in consultation with the Career Education and Workforce Development Board.

The office shall:

(A)Award grants to public and private organizations for the development and implementation of workforce training programs.

History.

Acts 1999, No. 1323, § 58; 2015, No. 892, § 5; 2019, No. 910, §§ 625, 626.

Subchapter 2

— Arkansas Rehabilitation Services

25-30-201. Arkansas Rehabilitation Services.

The policy and scope of the Arkansas Rehabilitation Services shall be to provide increased employment of individuals with disabilities through the provision of individualized training, independent living services, educational and support services, and meaningful opportunities for employment in integrated work settings to maximize employment, economic self-sufficiency, independence, and inclusion and integration into society.

Pursuant to that policy, rehabilitation services shall be provided to citizens throughout the state, and the rehabilitation plan adopted pursuant to this subchapter shall be in effect in all political subdivisions of the state.

History.

Acts 1999, No. 1323, § 58.

25-30-202. Scope of authority.

All authorities and responsibilities defined in the Rehabilitation Act of Arkansas, §20-79-201 et seq., shall be administered by Arkansas Rehabilitation Services under the direction of the Career Education and Workforce Development Board, except those transferred to the Division of State Services for the Blind of the Department of Human Services by §25-10-201 et seq.

Any and all statutory authority, powers, duties, functions, records, authorized positions, property, unexpended balances of appropriations, allocations, or other funds transferred from the Division of Rehabilitation Services to the Department of Human Services by Acts 1985, No. 348, are hereby transferred to Arkansas Rehabilitation Services.

History.

Acts 1999, No. 1323, § 58; 2015, No. 892, § 6; 2019, No. 910, § 627.

25-30-203. Powers and duties.

The Division of Workforce Services, through Arkansas Rehabilitation Services, shall provide the rehabilitation services authorized by this subchapter to eligible physically or mentally disabled individuals and those who can benefit from vocational rehabilitation and independent living services, as determined by the agency to be eligible therefor.

In carrying out the purposes of this subchapter, the Arkansas Rehabilitation Services is authorized, among other things:

History.

Acts 1999, No. 1323, § 58; 2007, No. 1207, §§ 1, 3; 2019, No. 910, § 628.

25-30-204. Eligibility for retirement systems.

All employees of the Arkansas Rehabilitation Services as of July 1, 1993, shall be eligible for membership in the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System, Arkansas Teacher Retirement System, or alternate retirement systems.

History.

Acts 1999, No. 1323, § 58.

25-30-205. Office facilities.

The Building Authority Division shall ensure that all offices of Arkansas Rehabilitation Services are exemplary models of accessibility and conform to the Americans with Disabilities Act, 42 U.S.C. § 12101 et seq., accessibility guidelines.

History.

Acts 1999, No. 1323, § 58; 2007, No. 186, § 12; 2015 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 7, § 61; 2015 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 8, § 61; 2019, No. 910, §§ 629, 3586.

A.C.R.C. Notes. Acts 2015 (1st Ex. Sess.), Nos. 7 and 8, § 1, provided:

“Transfer of the Arkansas Building Authority to the Department of Finance and Administration.

“(a)(1)The Arkansas Building Authority is transferred to the Department of Finance and Administration by a type 2 transfer under §25-2-105.

“(2)For the purposes of this act, the Department of Finance and Administration shall be considered a principal department established by Acts 1971, No. 38.

“(b)All authority, powers, duties, functions, records, personnel, property, unexpended balances of appropriations, allocations, and other funds, including the functions of budgeting or purchasing, are transferred to the Department of Finance and Administration, except as specified by this act.

“(c)All powers, duties, and functions, including rulemaking, regulation, and licensing, promulgation of rules, rates, regulations, and standards, and the rendering of findings, orders, and adjudications are transferred to the Director of the Department of Finance and Administration.

“(d)The members of the Arkansas Building Authority Council, and their successors, shall continue to be selected in the manner and serve for the terms provided by the statutes applicable to the council except as specified in this act.

“(e)The Arkansas Code Revision Commission shall make appropriate name changes in the Arkansas Code to implement this act.”

Amendments. The 2015 amendment by Acts 2015 (1st Ex. Sess.), Nos. 7 and 8 substituted “Building Authority Division of the Department of Finance and Administration” for “Arkansas Building Authority.”

The 2019 amendment deleted “of the Department of Finance and Administration” following “Building Authority Division” and “of the Department of Career Education” following “Arkansas Rehabilitation Services”.

25-30-206. Arkansas Rehabilitation Services Forgiveness of Student Loan Program.

There is established the Arkansas Rehabilitation Services Forgiveness of Student Loan Program to assist counselors employed by Arkansas Rehabilitation Services with the repayment of student loans.

The program shall be administered by Arkansas Rehabilitation Services.

Arkansas Rehabilitation Services shall promulgate rules for determining: a counselor's eligibility for a loan under the program that shall include the following requirements:

Satisfactory completion of any probationary employment period;

Proof of a student loan that remains unpaid, including the name and address of the creditor; and

An executed employment contract in which the counselor agrees to:

Work for Arkansas Rehabilitation Services for a term that equals two (2) years for each year that the program makes a payment on the counselor's student loan; and

Reimburse the program the full amount of any loan payments made under the program if the counselor resigns or is terminated for cause before the term of the contract terminates.

The amount of the payment to be made directly to the counselor's student loan creditor may not exceed:

Two thousand dollars ($2,000) per year; or

Ten thousand dollars ($10,000) per employee.

A.C.R.C. Notes. Acts 2014, No. 176, § 10, provided:

“FORGIVENESS OF STUDENT LOAN PROGRAM. The Forgiveness of Student Loan Program shall be available to counselors employed by Arkansas Rehabilitation Services that have been determined eligible by rules promulgated by Arkansas Rehabilitation Services as required by Arkansas Code §25-30-206. These rules shall be submitted to the Administrative Rules and Regulations Subcommittee of the Arkansas Legislative Council and receive prior review. These rules must include the following eligibility requirements:

“(1)Satisfactory completion of any probationary period;

“(2)Proof of a student loan that remains unpaid, including the name and address of the creditor;

“(3)An executed employment contract in which the counselor agrees to the following:

“(a)work for Arkansas Rehabilitation Services for a term that equals two (2) years for each year that the program makes a payment on the counselor's student loan and

“(b)reimburse the program the full amount of any loan payments made under this program in the event that the counselor resigns or is terminated for cause before the term of the contract terminates.

“The amount of payment to be made directly to the counselor's student loan creditor may not exceed:

“(1)Two thousand dollars ($2,000) per year; or

“(2)Ten thousand dollars ($10,000) per employee.

“The Arkansas Rehabilitation Services agency shall pay for the Forgiveness of Student Loan Program from the Rehabilitation Program Grants — Grants and Aid line item authorized for the appropriation entitled Rehabilitation Services — Operations in an amount not to exceed eighty thousand dollars ($80,000) per fiscal year.

“In addition, the Arkansas Rehabilitation Services agency shall provide a formal, written notification to all counselors employed by Arkansas Rehabilitation Services of the availability of the Forgiveness of Student Loan Program by July 1 of each fiscal year. The agency shall include with the notification, the promulgated rules which shall outline the eligibility requirements for participation.

“The agency shall submit a copy of this notification to the Arkansas Legislative Council or Joint Budget Committee by July 1 of each fiscal year. In addition, Arkansas Rehabilitation Services shall report bi-annually, by the 15th day of the month following the end of each six month period, to the Arkansas Legislative Council or Joint Budget Committee the number of employees participating in the program.”

Acts 2015, No. 867, § 11, provided:

“FORGIVENESS OF STUDENT LOAN PROGRAM. The Forgiveness of Student Loan Program shall be available to counselors employed by Arkansas Rehabilitation Services that have been determined eligible by rules promulgated by Arkansas Rehabilitation Services as required by Arkansas Code §25-30-206. These rules shall be submitted to the Administrative Rules and Regulations Subcommittee of the Arkansas Legislative Council and receive prior review. These rules must include the following eligibility requirements:

“(1)Satisfactory completion of any probationary period;

“(2)Proof of a student loan that remains unpaid, including the name and address of the creditor;

“(3)An executed employment contract in which the counselor agrees to the following:

“(a)work for Arkansas Rehabilitation Services for a term that equals two (2) years for each year that the program makes a payment on the counselor's student loan and

“(b)reimburse the program the full amount of any loan payments made under this program in the event that the counselor resigns or is terminated for cause before the term of the contract terminates.

“The amount of payment to be made directly to the counselor's student loan creditor may not exceed:

“(1)Two thousand dollars ($2,000) per year; or

“(2)Ten thousand dollars ($10,000) per employee.

“The Arkansas Rehabilitation Services agency shall pay for the Forgiveness of Student Loan Program from the Rehabilitation Program Grants — Grants and Aid line item authorized for the appropriation entitled Rehabilitation Services — Operations in an amount not to exceed eighty thousand dollars ($80,000) per fiscal year.

“In addition, the Arkansas Rehabilitation Services agency shall provide a formal, written notification to all counselors employed by Arkansas Rehabilitation Services of the availability of the Forgiveness of Student Loan Program by July 1 of each fiscal year. The agency shall include with the notification, the promulgated rules which shall outline the eligibility requirements for participation.

“The agency shall submit a copy of this notification to the Arkansas Legislative Council or Joint Budget Committee by July 1 of each fiscal year. In addition, Arkansas Rehabilitation Services shall report bi-annually, by the 15th day of the month following the end of each six month period, to the Arkansas Legislative Council or Joint Budget Committee the number of employees participating in the program.

“The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2015 through June 30, 2016.”

Acts 2016, No. 120, § 11, provided:

“FORGIVENESS OF STUDENT LOAN PROGRAM. The Forgiveness of Student Loan Program shall be available to counselors employed by Arkansas Rehabilitation Services that have been determined eligible by rules promulgated by Arkansas Rehabilitation Services as required by Arkansas Code §25-30-206. These rules shall be submitted to the Arkansas Legislative Council or Joint Budget Committee under §10-3-309 and receive review and approval. These rules must include the following eligibility requirements:

“(1)Satisfactory completion of any probationary period;

“(2)Proof of a student loan that remains unpaid, including the name and address of the creditor;

“(3)An executed employment contract in which the counselor agrees to the following:

“(a)work for Arkansas Rehabilitation Services for a term that equals two (2) years for each year that the program makes a payment on the counselor's student loan and

“(b)reimburse the program the full amount of any loan payments made under this program in the event that the counselor resigns or is terminated for cause before the term of the contract terminates.

“The amount of payment to be made directly to the counselor's student loan creditor may not exceed:

“(1)Two thousand dollars ($2,000) per year; or

“(2)Ten thousand dollars ($10,000) per employee.

“The Arkansas Rehabilitation Services agency shall pay for the Forgiveness of Student Loan Program from the Rehabilitation Program Grants — Grants and Aid line item authorized for the appropriation entitled Rehabilitation Services — Operations in an amount not to exceed eighty thousand dollars ($80,000) per fiscal year.

“In addition, the Arkansas Rehabilitation Services agency shall provide a formal, written notification to all counselors employed by Arkansas Rehabilitation Services of the availability of the Forgiveness of Student Loan Program by July 1 of each fiscal year. The agency shall include with the notification, the promulgated rules which shall outline the eligibility requirements for participation.

“The agency shall submit a copy of this notification to the Arkansas Legislative Council or Joint Budget Committee by July 1 of each fiscal year. In addition, Arkansas Rehabilitation Services shall report bi-annually, by the 15th day of the month following the end of each six month period, to the Arkansas Legislative Council or Joint Budget Committee the number of employees participating in the program.

“The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2016 through June 30, 2017.”

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “Arkansas Rehabilitation Services” for “the Arkansas Rehabilitation Services of the Department ofCareer Education” in (b)(1).

History.

Acts 2007, No. 1207, § 2; 2019, No. 910, § 630.

25-30-109. Office of Skills Development — Created — Duties.